Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-961
Community colleges;
responsibility for courses at associate-degree level or below.

The community colleges shall have, except in specified program
areas authorized by statute and the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education, sole responsibility for the award of associate degrees, diplomas,
and certificates comprised of courses at the associate-degree
level or below and approved by the commission pursuant to sections
85-1413 and 85-1414.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 45;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 102;

Laws 2011, LB637, § 28.